Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1445.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 45-341, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-341. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Community water system" means a public water system that serves at least fifteen service connections used by year-round residents of the area served by the system or that regularly serves at least twenty-five year-round residents of the area served by the system. A person is a year-round resident of the area served by a system if the persons primary residence is served water by that system. 2. "Large community water system" means a community water system that serves water to more than one thousand eight hundred fifty persons. 3. "Public water system" means an entity that distributes or sells water and that qualifies as a public water system under section 49-352, subsection B. 4. "Small community water system" means a community water system that does not qualify as a large community water system.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 49-241, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-241. Permit required to discharge A. Unless otherwise provided by this article, any person who discharges or who owns or operates a facility that discharges shall obtain an aquifer protection permit from the director. B. Unless exempted under section 49-250, or unless the director determines that the facility will be designed, constructed and operated so that there will be no migration of pollutants directly to the aquifer or to the vadose zone, the following are considered to be discharging facilities and shall be operated pursuant to either an individual permit or a general permit, including agricultural general permits, under this article: 1. Surface impoundments, including holding, storage settling, treatment or disposal pits, ponds and lagoons. 2. Solid waste disposal facilities except for mining overburden and wall rock that has not been and will not be subject to mine leaching operations. 3. Injection wells. 4. Land treatment facilities. 5. Facilities that add a pollutant to a salt dome formation, salt bed formation, dry well or underground cave or mine. 6. Mine tailings piles and ponds. 7. Mine leaching operations. 8. Underground water storage facilities. 9. Sewage treatment facilities, including on-site wastewater treatment facilities. 10. Wetlands designed and constructed to treat municipal and domestic wastewater for underground storage. C. The director shall provide public notice and an opportunity for public comment on any request for a determination from the director under subsection B of this section that there will be no migration of pollutants from a facility. A public hearing may be held at the discretion of the director if sufficient public comment warrants a hearing.  The director may inspect and may require reasonable conditions and appropriate monitoring and reporting requirements for a facility managing pollutants that are determined not to migrate under subsection B of this section.  The director may identify types of facilities, available technologies and technical criteria for facilities that will qualify for a determination.  The director's determination may be revoked on evidence that pollutants have migrated from the facility.  The director may impose a review fee for a determination under subsection B of this section. Any issuance, denial or revocation of a determination may be appealed pursuant to section 49-323. D. The director shall annually make the fee schedule for aquifer protection permit applications available to the public on request and on the department's website, and a list of the names and locations of the facilities that have filed applications for aquifer protection permits, with a description of the status of each application, is available to the public on request. E. The director shall prescribe the procedures for aquifer protection permit applications and fee collection under this section. The director shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all monies collected under this section in the water quality fee fund established by section 49-210 and may authorize expenditures from the fund, subject to legislative appropriation, to pay reasonable and necessary costs of processing and issuing permits and administering the registration program. F. For aquifer protection permits issued to a city or a town with a population of one thousand persons or more but less than ten thousand persons, the city or town may test BACTERIOLOGICAL samples on-site with testing equipment that is approved by the United States ENVIRONMENTAL protection agency. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 49-255.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-255.01. Arizona pollutant discharge elimination system program; rules and standards; affirmative defense; fees; general permit A. A person shall not discharge except under either of the following conditions: 1. In conformance with a permit that is issued or authorized under this article or rules authorized under section 49-203, subsection A, paragraph 2. 2. Pursuant to a permit that is issued or authorized by the United States environmental protection agency until a permit that is issued or authorized under this article takes effect. B. The director shall adopt rules to establish an AZPDES permit program for discharges to WOTUS consistent with the requirements of sections 402(b) and 402(p) of the clean water act. This program shall include requirements to ensure compliance with section 307 and requirements for the control of discharges consistent with sections 318 and 405(a) of the clean water act. The director shall not adopt any requirement for WOTUS that is more stringent than any requirement of the clean water act. The director shall not adopt any requirement that conflicts with any requirement of the clean water act. The director may adopt federal rules pursuant to section 41-1028 or may adopt rules to reflect local environmental conditions to the extent that the rules are consistent with and not more stringent than the clean water act and this article. C. The rules adopted by the director under subsection B of this section shall provide for: 1. Issuing, authorizing, denying, modifying, suspending or revoking individual or general permits. 2. Establishing permit conditions, discharge limitations and standards of performance as prescribed by section 49-203, subsection A, paragraph 8, including case-by-case effluent limitations that are developed in a manner consistent with 40 Code of Federal Regulations section 125.3(c). 3. Modifications and variances as allowed by the clean water act. 4. Other provisions necessary for maintaining state program authority under section 402(b) of the clean water act. 5. For a city or town with a population of one thousand persons or more but less than ten thousand persons, using on-site testing equipment that is approved by the United States ENVIRONMENTAL protection agency to detect bacteriological MATERIAL. D. This article does not affect the validity of any existing rules that are adopted by the director and that are equivalent to and consistent with the national pollutant discharge elimination system program authorized under section 402 of the clean water act until new rules for AZPDES discharges are adopted pursuant to this article. E. An upset constitutes an affirmative defense to any administrative, civil or criminal enforcement action brought for noncompliance with technology-based permit discharge limitations if the permittee complies with all of the following: 1. The permittee demonstrates through properly signed contemporaneous operating logs or other relevant evidence that: (a) An upset occurred and that the permittee can identify the specific cause of the upset. (b) The permitted facility was being properly operated at the time of the upset. (c) If the upset causes the discharge to exceed any discharge limitation in the permit, the permittee submitted notice to the department within twenty-four hours after the upset. (d) The permittee has taken appropriate remedial measures including all reasonable steps to minimize or prevent any discharge or sewage sludge use or disposal that is in violation of the permit and that has a reasonable likelihood of adversely affecting human health or the environment. 2. In any administrative, civil or criminal enforcement action, the permittee shall prove, by a preponderance of the evidence, the occurrence of an upset condition. F. Compliance with a permit issued pursuant to this article shall be deemed compliance with both of the following: 1. All requirements in this article or rules adopted pursuant to this article relating to state implementation of sections 301, 302, 306 and 307 of the clean water act, except for any standard that is imposed under section 307 of the clean water act for a toxic pollutant that is injurious to human health. 2. Limitations for pollutants in WOTUS adopted pursuant to sections 49-221 and 49-222, if the discharge of the pollutant is specifically limited in a permit issued pursuant to this article or the pollutant was specifically identified as present or potentially present in facility discharges during the application process for the permit. G. Notwithstanding section 49-203, subsection D, permits that are issued under this article shall not be combined with permits issued under article 3 of this chapter. H. The decision of the director to issue or modify a permit takes effect on issuance if there were no changes requested in comments that were submitted on the draft permit unless a later effective date is specified in the decision. In all other cases, the decision of the director to issue, deny, modify, suspend or revoke a permit takes effect thirty days after the decision is served on the permit applicant, unless either of the following applies: 1. Within the thirty-day period, an appeal is filed with the water quality appeals board pursuant to section 49-323. 2. A later effective date is specified in the decision. I. In addition to other reservations of rights provided by this chapter, this article does not impair or affect rights or the exercise of rights to water claimed, recognized, permitted, certificated, adjudicated or decreed pursuant to state or other law. J. The director shall establish by rule fees, including maximum fees, to pay expenses incurred in implementing the AZPDES permit program. Monies collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, in the water quality fee fund established by section 49-210. K. Any permit conditions concerning threatened or endangered species shall be limited to those required by the endangered species act. L. When developing a general permit for discharges of storm water from construction activity, the director shall provide for reduced control measures at sites that retain storm water in a manner that eliminates discharges from the site, except for the occurrence of an extreme event. Reduced control measures shall be available if all of the following conditions are met: 1. The nearest downstream receiving water is ephemeral and the construction site is a sufficient distance from a water warranting additional protection as described in the general permit. 2. The construction activity occurs on a site designed so that all storm water generated by disturbed areas of the site exclusive of public rights-of-way is directed to one or more retention basins that are designed to retain the runoff from an extreme event. For the purposes of this subsection, "extreme event" means a rainfall event that meets or exceeds the local one hundred-year, two-hour storm event as calculated by an Arizona registered professional engineer using industry practices. 3. The owner or operator complies with good housekeeping measures included in the general permit. 4. The owner or operator maintains the capacity of the retention basins. 5. Construction conforms to the standards prescribed by this section. M. If the director commences proceedings for the renewal of a general permit issued pursuant to this article, the existing general permit shall not expire and coverage may continue to be obtained by new dischargers until the proceedings have resulted in a final determination by the director. If the proceedings result in a decision not to renew the general permit, the existing general permit shall continue in effect until the last day for filing for review of the decision of the director not to renew the permit or until any later date that is fixed by court order. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 49-352, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-352. Classifying systems and certifying personnel; limitation A. The department shall establish and enforce rules for the classification of classifying systems for potable water and certifying operating personnel according to the skill, knowledge and experience necessary within the classification. The rules shall also provide that operating personnel may be certified on the basis of training and supervision at the place of employment. The department may assess and collect reasonable certification fees to reimburse the cost of certification services, which shall be deposited in the water quality fee fund established by section 49-210. Such rules apply to all public water systems involved in the collection, storage, treatment or distribution of potable water. The rules do not apply to systems that are not public water systems, including irrigation, industrial or similar systems where the water is used for nonpotable purposes. B. Notwithstanding any other law, the department may not require a community water system that is located in a county with a population of four hundred thousand persons or less and that serves twenty-five or fewer service connections to maintain a minimum storage capacity that is larger than one thousand gallons. B. c. For the purposes of this article: 1. A public water system is a water system that: (a) Provides water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances. (b) Has at least fifteen service connections or regularly serves an average of at least twenty-five persons daily for at least sixty days a year. 2. A public water system as described in paragraph 1, subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subsection includes any collection, treatment, storage and distribution facilities that are under the control of the operator of a public water system and that are used primarily in connection with the system and any collection or pretreatment storage facilities that are not under the control of the operator of a public water system and that are used primarily in connection with a public water system. 3. A service connection does not include a connection to a system that delivers water by a constructed conveyance other than a pipe, if any of the following applies: (a) The water is used exclusively for purposes other than residential uses consisting of drinking, cooking or bathing or other similar uses. (b) The department determines that alternative water is provided for residential or similar uses for drinking and cooking and that the water achieves a level of public health protection that is equivalent to the applicable national primary drinking water regulations. (c) The department determines that the water that is provided for residential or similar uses for drinking, cooking and bathing is centrally treated or is treated at the point of entry by the water provider, a pass-through entity or the user to achieve the level of public health protection that is equivalent to the applicable national primary drinking water regulations. 4. An irrigation district in existence before May 18, 1994 and that provides primarily agricultural service through a piped water system with only incidental residential or similar use is not a public water system if the system or the residential or other similar users of the system comply with paragraph 3, subdivision (b) or (c) of this subsection. 5. Persons who receive water through connections that are not service connections pursuant to paragraph 3 of this subsection are not included in the computation of the number of persons prescribed by paragraph 1, subdivision (b) of this subsection.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 49-353, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-353. Duties of director; rules; prohibited lead use A. The director shall: 1. Exercise general supervision over all matters related to water quality control of public water systems throughout this state. 2. Prescribe rules regarding the production, treatment, distribution and testing of potable water by public water systems, except that such rules shall not apply to irrigation, industrial or similar systems where the water is used for nonpotable purposes. The rules shall comply with at least the following: (a) The requirements established by the United States environmental protection agency for state primary enforcement responsibility of the safe drinking water act, including the requirements of 40 Code of Federal Regulations parts 141 and 142. (b) Require that the plans and specifications for all public water systems, including water treatment plants, distribution systems, distribution system extensions, water treatment methods and devices and all appurtenances and devices for sale to be used in water supplies and public water systems be submitted with a fee for review to the department. The department, in establishing fees authorized by this section, shall comply with title 41, chapter 6. The department shall not set a fee at more than the department's cost of providing the service for which the fee is charged. State agencies are exempt from all fees imposed pursuant to this section. Monies collected from the fees shall be deposited in the water quality fee fund established by section 49-210. The director may require that plans and specifications for public water systems include programs to meet future needs for drinking water and to supply specified minimum quantities of drinking water. The director shall: (i) Require that a new public water system demonstrate that the system possesses adequate managerial and financial capacity to operate in compliance with this article and the rules adopted pursuant to this article. (ii) Accept adequate findings of other public authorities regarding the adequate managerial and financial capacity of a public water system to operate in compliance with this article and the rules adopted pursuant to this article. (c) Provide that no public water system, including a water treatment plant, distribution system, distribution system extension, water treatment method or device, appurtenance and device used in water supplies or public water systems be constructed, reconstructed, installed or initiated before compliance with the standards and rules has been demonstrated by approval of the plans and specifications by the department. The rules shall prescribe minimum standards for the bacteriological, physical and chemical quality of water distributed through public water systems. The director of environmental quality may consult with the director of the department of health services in developing these standards. (d) Provide for a simplified administrative procedure for approving structural revisions, additions, extensions or modifications to existing small public water systems for potable water serving a population of three thousand three hundred or fewer persons. (e) Exempt from the plan review requirements of this paragraph, including any requirements for approval to construct or approval of construction, any structural revisions, additions, extensions or modifications to public water systems which are in compliance with the department's rules applicable to those systems or which are making satisfactory progress towards compliance under a schedule approved by the department if either of the following conditions is satisfied: (i) The revision, addition, extension or modification has a project cost of twelve thousand five hundred dollars $12,500 or less. (ii) The revision, addition, extension or modification is made to a water line which that is not for a subdivision requiring plat approval by a city, town or county, and has a project cost of more than twelve thousand five hundred dollars $12,500 but less than fifty thousand dollars $50,000, the design of which is sealed by a professional engineer registered in this state and the construction of which is reviewed for conformance with the design by a professional engineer. (f) Require a notice of compliance with the conditions for exemption on the completion of any revisions, additions, extensions or modifications completed in accordance with subdivision (e) of this paragraph. (g) Provide for the submission of samples at stated intervals. (h) Provide for inspection and certification of such water supplies. (i) Provide for the abatement as public nuisances of any premises, equipment, process or device, or public water system that does not comply with the minimum standards and rules. (j) Provide for records regarding water quality to be kept by owners and operators of the public water systems and that reports regarding water quality be filed with the department. (k) Provide for appropriate actions to be taken if a water supply does not meet the standards established by the department. (l) Require a public water system to implement a specified program to control contamination from backflow, backsiphonage or cross connection. All such programs shall be consistent with section 37-1388. (m) Require that public water systems identify and provide notice to persons that may be affected by lead contamination of their drinking water where such contamination results from either or both of the following: (i) The lead content in the construction materials of the public water distribution system. (ii) Corrosivity of the water supply sufficient to cause leaching of lead. (n) Provide for relief from water testing and monitoring requirements for public water systems qualifying under the federal safe drinking water act (P.L. 93-523; 88 Stat. 1661 1660; P.L. 95-190; 91 Stat. 1393; P.L. 104-182; 110 Stat. 1613), as amended in 1996. 3. Develop and implement strategies to assist public water systems in acquiring and maintaining the technical, managerial and financial capacity to operate in compliance with this article and the rules adopted pursuant to this article. Assistance may be provided based on the needs of the water system. B. Pipes, pipe fittings and plumbing fittings and fixtures having a lead content in excess of a weighted average of one-quarter of one percent lead when used with respect to the wetted surfaces and solders and flux having a lead content in excess of two-tenths of one percent shall not be used in the installation or repair of public water systems or of any plumbing in residential or nonresidential facilities providing water for human consumption. The weighted average lead content of a pipe, pipe fitting or plumbing fitting or fixture shall be calculated as follows: 1. For each wetted component, the percentage of lead in the component shall be multiplied by the ratio of the wetted surface area of that component to the total wetted surface area of the entire product to arrive at the weighted percentage of lead of the component. 2. The weighted percentage of lead of each wetted component shall be added together, and the sum of these weighted percentages shall constitute the weighted average lead content of the product. 3. The lead content of the material used to produce a wetted component shall be used to determine compliance with this subsection. 4. For lead content of materials that are provided as a range, the maximum content of that range shall be used. C. Subsection B of this section does not apply to: 1. Leaded joints necessary for the repair of cast iron pipes. 2. Pipes, pipe fittings and plumbing fittings and fixtures, including backflow preventers, that are used exclusively for nonpotable water services such as manufacturing, industrial processing, irrigation, outdoor watering or any other uses where the water is not anticipated to be used for human consumption. 3. Toilets, bidets, urinals, fill valves, flushometer valves, tub fillers, shower valves or service saddles or water distribution main gate valves that are two inches in diameter or larger. D. Notwithstanding subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivision (c) of this section, a public water system may construct, reconstruct, install, extend or initiate a water supply system, water treatment plant, distribution system, water treatment method or device, or appurtenance that is used in water supply or in a public water system when the system is out of compliance with standards and rules adopted pursuant to this article only if the construction is necessary to correct the system's noncompliance. E. This section and the rules adopted pursuant to this section apply to public water systems as described by section 49-352, subsection B.END_STATUTE